sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve nagradnega traku: Lepilna podlaga; Krokodil sponka; Značka s sponko; Buldog sponka; Brez priloženega nastavka; Značka s trakom; Varnostna sponka; Zanka za prišitje; Ravna bucika; Vrvica/zanka; Drugo
fi: Palkintonauhan kiinnitystyyppi: Liimatausta; Hauenleuka; Rintaneula; Puristinklipsi; Ei sisällä kiinnikettä; Kunniamerkkiripa; Hakaneula; Ommeltava lenkki; Nuppineula; Naru/Lenkki; Muu
ru: Тип крепления наградной ленты: Клейкая основа; Зажим «крокодил»; Булавка-планка; Зажим-прищепка; Без крепления в комплекте; Орденская планка; Английская булавка; Пришивная петля; Прямая булавка; Шнурок / петля; Другое
hu: Díjszalag rögzítési típusa: Öntapadós hátlap; Krokodilcsipesz; Tűs rögzítés; Bulldog csipesz; Nincs rögzítő mellékelve; Kitüntetésszalag; Biztosítótű; Felvarrható hurok; Gombostű; Madzag/hurok; Egyéb
de: Befestigungsart für Auszeichnungsbänder: Kleberückseite; Krokodilklemme; Broschiernadel; Bulldog-Klemme; Keine Befestigung enthalten; Ordensspange; Sicherheitsnadel; Schlaufe zum Annähen; Stecknadel; Schnur/Schlaufe; Sonstige
el: Τύπος προσάρτησης κορδέλας βραβείου: Αυτοκόλλητη πλάτη; Κλιπ τύπου κροκοδειλάκι; Καρφίτσα με μπάρα; Κλιπ bulldog; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται εξάρτημα στερέωσης; Μπάρα μεταλλίων/κορδέλας; Παραμάνα; Ραφτή θηλιά; Ίσια καρφίτσα; Κορδόνι/θηλιά; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul de atașare a panglicii certificatului: Parte posterioară adezivă; Clemă tip crocodil; Ac de siguranță cu bară; Clemă bulldog; Niciun sistem de prindere inclus; Bară pentru panglică; Ac de siguranță; Buclă pentru cusut; Ac cu gămălie; Șnur/buclă; Altele
cs: Typ uchycení stuhy k zavěšení ocenění: Lepicí zadní strana; Krokodýlová svorka; Brožový špendlík; Klip bulldog; Bez upevnění; Stužka; Zavírací špendlík; Našité poutko; Klasický špendlík; Provázek/poutko; Ostatní
zh-CN: 获奖丝带佩戴方式: 背胶; 鳄鱼夹; 别针; 斗牛犬夹; 不包含附件; 绶带夹; 安全别针; 缝制环; 直别针; 细绳/系环; 其他
zh-TW: 絲帶獎章固定類型: 黏性背膠; 鱷魚夾; 橫條別針; 辦公夾; 不含配件; 緞帶條; 安全別針; 縫紉環; 直頭針; 繩子/吊環; 其他
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia kokardy: Lepiaca zadná strana; Krokosvorka; Pripínací špendlík; Kancelárska spona (Bulldog); Bez upevnenia; Stužka; Zatvárací špendlík; Slučka na prišitie; Rovný špendlík; Šnúrka/Slučka; Iné
th: ประเภทการติดริบบิ้นรางวัล: ด้านหลังแบบมีกาว; คลิปปากจระเข้; เข็มกลัดแบบบาร์; คลิปหนีบกระดาษ; ไม่รวมอุปกรณ์สำหรับติด; แพรแถบ; เข็มกลัด; ห่วงสำหรับเย็บติด; เข็มหมุด; เชือก/ห่วง; อื่นๆ
ja: 賞品リボンの取り付けタイプ: 粘着裏地; ワニ口クリップ; バーピン; ブルドッグクリップ; アタッチメントなし; リボンバー; 安全ピン; 縫い付けループ; ストレートピン; 紐・ループ; その他
en: Award ribbon attachment type: Adhesive backing; Alligator clip; Bar pin; Bulldog clip; No attachment included; Ribbon bar; Safety pin; Sew-on loop; Straight pin; String/loop; Other
fr: Type de fixation du ruban de récompense: Dos adhésif; Pince crocodile; Broche; Pince à dessin; Aucune attache incluse; Barrette de décorations; Épingle à nourrice; Boucle à coudre; Épingle droite; Ficelle/boucle; Autre
pl: Typ mocowania wstążki nagrody: Spód samoprzylepny; Klips typu krokodylek; Zapięcie belkowe; Klips biurowy (bulldog); Brak mocowania w zestawie; Baretka; Agrafka; Pętelka do przyszycia; Szpilka; Sznurek / pętelka; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja nagradne vrpce: Ljepljiva poleđina; Krokodilska kopča; Igla sa sigurnosnom kopčom; Buldog kopča; Bez dodatka za pričvršćivanje; Značka (ribbon bar); Sigurnosna igla; Omča na ušivanje; Ravna igla; Vezica/omča; Ostalo
da: Fastgørelsestype for præmiebånd: Selvklæbende bagside; Krokodillenæb; Brochenål; Bulldog-klemme; Ingen vedhæftning inkluderet; Båndspænde; Sikkerhedsnål; Påsyningsløkke; Knappenål; Snor/løkke; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação da fita de premiação: Adesivo no verso; Presilha jacaré; Broche de barra; Presilha bulldog; Nenhum acessório incluído; Barreta de fita; Alfinete de segurança; Alça para costurar; Alfinete reto; Cordão/laço; Outro
sv: Typ av fäste för rosett: Självhäftande baksida; Krokodilklämma; Broschnål; Bulldogklämma; Fäste ingår ej; Släpspänne; Säkerhetsnål; Påsydd ögla; Knappnål; Snöre/ögla; Annat
vi: Kiểu gắn ruy băng giải thưởng: Mặt sau có keo dán; Kẹp cá sấu; Ghim cài; Kẹp bướm; Không kèm theo phụ kiện gắn; Thanh cuống huân chương; Kim băng; Vòng đai khâu sẵn; Ghim thẳng; Dây/vòng đai; Khác
nl: Awardlint bevestigingstype: Zelfklevende achterkant; Krokodillenklem; Brochespeld; Bulldogklem; Geen bevestiging inbegrepen; Baton; Veiligheidsspeld; Opnaailus; Steekspeld; Touwtje/lus; Overige
it: Tipo di attacco del nastro premio: Supporto adesivo; Clip a coccodrillo; Spilla a barra; Clip bulldog; Nessun attacco incluso; Barretta per nastro; Spilla da balia; Passante da cucire; Spillo dritto; Cordoncino/Passante; Altro
ko: 상장 리본 부착 유형: 접착식 뒷면; 악어 클립; 바 핀; 불독 클립; 부착물 미포함; 리본 바; 옷핀; 재봉용 루프; 시침핀; 끈/루프; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação da fita de prémio: Fundo adesivo; Mola crocodilo; Alfinete de barra; Mola bulldog; Nenhum acessório incluído; Barra de fita; Alfinete de ama; Argola para costura; Alfinete direito; Cordão/argola; Outros
bg-BG: Вид закрепване на наградата във формата на панделка: Залепващ гръб; Клипс тип алигатор; Игла за значка; Клипс тип булдог; Не е включено закрепване; Лента с клипс; Безопасна игла; Пришиваща се халка; Права игла; Връв/халка; Друго
es: Tipo de enganche del listón del premio: Reverso adhesivo; Pinza de cocodrilo; Pin de barra; Pinza bulldog; Sin accesorio incluido; Pasador de cinta; Imperdible; Bucle para coser; Alfiler; Cuerda/bucle; Otro
nb: Type feste for premiebånd: Selvklebende bakside; Krokodilleklemme; Nål; Papirklemme; Ingen feste inkludert; Båndspenne; Sikkerhetsnål; Påsydd løkke; Rett nål; Snor/løkke; Annet
lt-LT: Apdovanojimo kaspino tvirtinimo tipas: Klijuojama nugarėlė; Krokodilo tipo segtukas; Smeigtukas su fiksatoriumi; Spyruoklinis segtukas; Be tvirtinimo detalių; Juostelės plokštelė; Žiogelis; Prisiuvama kilpa; Tiesus smeigtukas; Virvelė / kilpa; Kita
tr: Ödül kurdelesi bağlantı türü: Yapışkanlı sırt; Timsah klips; Çubuk iğne; Mandal klips; Eklenti dahil değil; Şerit rozet; Çengelli iğne; Dikilebilir halka; Düz iğne; İp/halka; Diğer